Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 4. Trust Funds

Cross references. —

As to handling of property and investments by fiduciaries generally, see §

2-3-301

et seq.

As to banks generally, see §

13-1-101

et seq.

As to trust companies generally, see §

13-5-101

et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d Banks § 583; 76 Am. Jur. 2d Trusts §§ 273-320.

90A C.J.S. Trusts § 487.

§ 2-3-401.
Short title.

W.S.

2-3-401

through

2-3-403

may be cited as the “Uniform Common Trust Fund Act”.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 17, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 4-20; W.S. 1977, §

4-4-101

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-3-402.
Authority to establish; purpose.

Any bank or trust company qualified to act as fiduciary in this state may establish and administer common trust funds composed of property permitted by law for investment in trust funds for the purpose of furnishing investments to:

Itself as fiduciary;

Itself and others as cofiduciaries;

Any affiliated bank or trust company including any foreign affiliated bank or trust company as fiduciary;

Any affiliated bank or trust company including any foreign affiliated bank or trust company and others as cofiduciaries; or

Any combination of the entities listed in paragraphs (i) through (iv) of this subsection.

Any bank or trust company may as fiduciary or cofiduciary invest funds which it lawfully holds for investment in interests in common trust funds administered by itself or by any affiliated bank or trust company, if such investment is not prohibited by the instrument, judgment, decree, order, or statute creating or governing the fiduciary relationship, and if, in the case of a cofiduciary, the bank or trust company procures the consent of its cofiduciary in such investment.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 17, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 4-21; W.S. 1977, § 4-4-102; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1989, ch 56, § 2.

§ 2-3-403.
Accounting.

Unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction, the bank or trust company operating common trust funds is not required to render a court accounting with regard to these funds, but it may by application to the court secure approval of an accounting on such conditions as the court may establish.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 17, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 4-22; W.S. 1977, § 4-4-103; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-3-404.
Common trust fund distinct from participating fiduciaries.

Each common trust fund established hereunder is a separate and distinct entity from the fiduciaries participating in the fund. No fiduciary in administering its and other fiduciaries participation in a common trust fund may be required to make any apportionment or allocation between the principal and income of the fund between the participating fiduciaries different from that made for the common trust fund.

No fiduciary participating in a common trust fund, or person having an interest in property invested in the common trust fund, may have or be considered to have any ownership in any particular property of the common trust fund. Each participating fiduciary shall have a proportionate undivided interest in the fund and its income. The ownership of all property of the common trust fund shall be in the trustee of the fund.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 56, § 1.

§ 2-3-405.
“Affiliated” defined.

For purposes of this article, two (2) or more banks or trust companies are affiliated if they are members of the same affiliated group, within the meaning of section 1504 of the United States Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. § 1504].

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 56, § 1.

§ 2-3-406.
Exemption.

The establishment and maintenance of common trust funds under this article are exempt from the provisions of title 17, chapter 4.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 56, § 1.